Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) The Department of Education shall establish and administer  the Summer Learning
Grant program.
(2)(a) Under  the grant program, the department shall award grants for summer learning pro-
grams that are provided to incoming kindergarten students through outgoing grade 12 students.
(b) A summer learning program is eligible for a grant if the  program [ meets all three of the fol-
lowing requirements: ] focuses on improving a student’s reading proficiency by:
(A) Prioritizing the improvement of student academic outcomes;
(B) Incorporating evidence-based  literacy instruction and interventions designed to sup-
port students who are reading below grade level; and
(C) Using a variety of learning strategies that:
(i) Align with academic content standards adopted under ORS 329.045;
(ii) Are focused on evidenced-based literacy, mathematics, science or language arts; and
(iii) When appropriate, assist with credit recovery.
(c) A summer  learning program may include enrichment activities if the activities are
designed to improve student academic outcomes  and are combined with evidence-based
interventions.
[(a) The program provides academic enrichment by: ]
[(A) Using  a variety of learning strategies that align with academic content standards adopted
under ORS 329.045 and focused on mathematics, science, language arts or personal  financial education
and that, when appropriate, assist with credit recovery; and ]
[(B) As  appropriate, assisting with school readiness and providing transition supports prior to
kindergarten, prior to middle school, through the middle and high school grades or after high school
graduation.]
[(b) The program provides youth development by using a broad array  of well-rounded enrichment
opportunities that: ]
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 1
[(A) Include hands-on, inquiry-based and project-based learning, which may include  access to the
arts; and]
[(B) Support students’ mental, emotional and social well-being. ]
[(c) The program provides equitable access, outreach and engagement by: ]
[(A) Using culturally  and linguistically responsive approaches to student academic success and
well-being; and]
[(B) Engaging families as partners in students’ academic success. ]
(3) [In addition to the requirements prescribed by subsection (2) of this section, ] A summer learning
program must be provided for a minimum  of 80 total hours for each session of the program. Cal-
culations made under this subsection may include hours provided by an entity with which a  part-
nership has been entered into, as described in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(4)(a) Any school district, education service district, [ or] public charter  school or federally re-
cognized Indian tribe in this  state , or any combination thereof, may apply to receive a grant un-
der this section for a summer learning program.
(b) The department shall award a grant to an applicant based  on whether the applicant meets
the requirements for the grant. An application for a grant must include:
(A) A description of the summer learning program and how the program satisfies the require-
ments described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(B) Documentation that the applicant has a plan for summer learning, which may include:
[(i) A plan developed  under ORS 327.185 to receive a grant from the Student  Investment
Account; ]
[(ii)] (i) An early literacy success plan developed under ORS 327.831 to  receive a grant under
the Early Literacy Success School Grant program; or
[(iii)] (ii) A plan  developed under ORS 327.883 to receive a grant under the High School Grad-
uation and College and Career Readiness Act[ ; or ].
[(iv) A plan developed as required  to receive federal funding, as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule. ]
[(C) A description of how  the grant will be used with other funding sources available to the ap-
plicant.]
(C) An identification of the assessments that the applicant will provide  at the beginning
of the summer  learning program and after the summer learning program. Assessments are
subject to approval by the department and shall be used  for the purpose of the report de-
scribed in subsection (7)(e) of this section.
(D) A  description of the budget for how the grant will be used, including the budget of
the applicant related to the provision of a summer learning program.
(c)(A) An applicant for a grant may  enter into a partnership with one or more entities as de-
scribed in this paragraph  to provide  a summer learning program that is funded by a grant under
this section.
(B) Entities with which an applicant may enter into a partnership include  a school district, an
education service district, [ a federally recognized Indian tribe in  this state, a community-based or-
ganization,] a public charter school, an institution of higher education, a unit of local govern-
ment as defined in ORS 190.003, [ or] a local service district as defined in ORS  174.116[.], a federally
recognized Indian tribe in this state, a community-based organization or a nonprofit entity.
(C) An applicant may enter into a partnership with an entity identified in subparagraph
(B) of this  paragraph if the entity has demonstrated an ability to assist in literacy instruc-
tion and activities or academic enrichment, as determined by the applicant.
[(C)] (D) If an applicant applies for a grant  based on a plan that includes a partnership with an
entity identified in  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the applicant must provide with the appli-
cation a written letter  of support from the entity. The letter must include a description of services
to be provided by the entity and the budget of the entity for the provision of those services.
[(5)(a) The department shall award grants under this section based  on a formula established by the
State Board of Education by rule. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 2
[(b) When awarding grants, the department shall: ]
[(A) Prioritize funding for summer learning programs that serve student groups that have histor-
ically experienced academic disparities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b). ]
[(B) Encourage and support partnerships with entities identified in subsection (4)(c)(B) of this  sec-
tion to provide expanded learning opportunities during nonschool hours. ]
(5)(a) When awarding grants, the department shall prioritize applicants that:
(A) Submit a summer  learning plan that uses research-aligned literacy strategies, as
defined in ORS 327.825.
(B) Have the lowest rates of reading proficiency, as determined based on criteria provided
by the department.
(C) Have focused interventions that target students who have  demonstrated academic
needs, including students whose level of proficiency is not at grade level.
[(c)] (b) The department shall establish the process  and timelines for awarding a grant under
this section. The process must be communicated on the department’s website  and be easily accessi-
ble by applicants.
(6)(a) Grants awarded under this section may be used for all expenses related to:
(A) Providing personnel and staffing for a summer learning program, including professional  de-
velopment.
(B) Providing summer learning, including curriculum, technology and other supplies.
(C) Contracting with third parties to provide a summer learning program.
[(D) Providing incentives and removing barriers to student participation in  a summer learning
program.]
[(E)] (D) Providing facilities that will support and accommodate a summer learning program.
[(F)] (E) Providing student transportation for a summer learning program.
[(G)] (F) Providing nutritious snacks and meals to participants of a summer learning program
when snacks or meals are not provided  through the United States Department of
Agriculture’s Summer Food Service Program  or through a summer meals program that is
part of a national lunch program .
[(H) Engaging family members in summer learning program activities. ]
(b) Expenses for allowed uses identified in paragraph  (a) of this subsection may include
the administrative expenses  of an entity with which a recipient of a grant has entered into
a partnership as described in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
[(b)] (c) [ As provided by rule of the  State Board of Education, ] A recipient of a grant received
under this section may use a percentage of the grant moneys for [ administrative expenses. The rules
shall:] the administrative expenses of the recipient as follows:
[(A) Provide for the use of grant moneys for the administrative  expenses of both the applicant and
any entities with which the applicant has entered into a  partnership to provide a summer learning
program; and]
[(B) Limit the percentage of grant moneys that may  be used for administrative expenses, as allowed
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to no more than a total  of 10 percent of the grant
amount.]
(A) Five percent of the grant amount, excluding  any amounts used for student trans-
portation, if the recipient has entered into a partnership with an entity as  described in sub-
section (4)(c) of this section to administer the summer learning program in  its entirety, with
the exception of the provision of student transportation; or
(B) Ten percent of  the grant amount, excluding any amounts used for student transpor-
tation, for a recipient who has not entered into a partnership with an entity as  described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(7) [In administering the  grant program, the department shall minimize administrative barriers for
grant recipients while retaining accountability for resources allocated and spent. ] Recipients of a grant
must provide to the department a report that includes:
(a) The number and demographics of students served by the summer learning program;
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 3
(b) Activities of the summer learning program , including the number  of hours for each ac-
tivity;
(c) Information regarding staffing levels of the summer  learning program and training provided
to staff of the summer learning program;
(d) A description of how activities of the summer learning  program supported the requirements
described in [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and (3)  of this section; [ and]
[(e) A report on three or more of the following outcome areas: ]
[(A) Perception surveys of the summer learning program, as  provided by students, staff and fami-
lies;]
[(B) Qualitative data and stories of impact for the summer learning program; ]
[(C) Credits earned by participants of the summer learning program, if applicable; ]
[(D) Participation of the summer learning program provider  in site visits, interviews or focus
groups; or]
[(E) Summer learning program evaluations by a third party. ]
(e) An evaluation of the assessments  provided at the beginning of the summer learning
program and at the end of the summer learning program to identify changes  in students’
academic outcomes and to determine the effectiveness of the program;
(f) The identification of any successful activities or  strategies and of any activities or
strategies that may need to be modified;
(g) The identification of the number  of credits earned by participants of the summer
learning program, if applicable; and
(h) A budget report on how the grant moneys were used.
(8) Each year, the department shall prepare reports that summarize the reports received
from recipients of a grant under subsection (7)  of this section. The department shall provide
to the subcommittee of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means related to education:
(a) A preliminary report no later than January 15 of each year.
(b) A final report no later than February 15 of each year.
(9) Each biennium, the department shall review statewide student  academic outcomes to
determine which academic content areas to prioritize  for summer learning programs for the
upcoming biennium.
[(8)] (10) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 3. (1) The Summer Learning Grant Program Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Summer Learning Grant Program Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assem-
bly; and
(b) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the Summer Learning Grant Program Fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Education for  the purpose of carrying out section 2, chapter 6, Oregon
Laws 2024.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 4
Passed by House April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 5